Utah statutes.
62A-2-115.   Injunctive relief and other legal procedures.

In addition to, and notwithstanding, any other remedy provided by law the department may, in a manner provided by law and upon the advice of the attorney general, who shall represent the department in the proceedings, maintain an action in the name of the state for injunction or other process against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent the establishment, management, or operation of a human services program or facility in violation of this chapter or rules established under this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 75, 2009 General Session

